Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-1005
Rule 1005. Public records; contents, how proved.

The contents of an official record, or of a document authorized to be recorded or filed and actually recorded or filed, including data compilations in any form, if otherwise admissible, may be proved by copy, certified as correct in accordance with section 27-902 or testified to be correct by a witness who has compared it with the original. If a copy which complies with the foregoing cannot be obtained by the exercise of reasonable diligence, then other evidence of the contents may be given.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 68.